Montana, session 2025, HB950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 950

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 950.1

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Trade office -- intent. (1) The department of commerce shall establish,
staff with at least one person, and maintain a trade office in Israel to promote trade and tourism between the
residents of Israel and the residents of Montana.
(2) The establishment of the trade office is for promotional purposes only and is not intended to
regulate or impede interstate commerce or commerce with foreign nations.
(3) The purpose of the trade office is to strengthen cultural, diplomatic, and economic ties between
this state and Israel and to strengthen and expand existing relations and opportunities, including but not limited
to:
(a) agriculture, particularly pulse crops, meats, and agricultural technologies;
(b) culture, diplomacy, and educational exchange programs; and
(c) technology, security, and defense research and development, including optics, photonics, and
quantum computing.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $500,000 from the general fund
to the department of commerce for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes established in
[section 1].
(2) The appropriation in subsection (1) is intended to be included in the ongoing base until June
30, 2033, after which the amount of the appropriation must be removed from the base.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 90, and the provisions of Title 90 apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2033.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 950